Washington statutes.
RCW 13.16.040

Counties authorized to acquire facilities and employ adequate staffs.

Boards of county commissioners in the various counties now suffering from a lack of adequate detention facilities for dependent, delinquent and wayward children shall, in the manner provided by law, declare an emergency and appropriate, in the manner provided by law, sufficient funds to meet all demands for adequate care of dependent, delinquent and wayward children. All appropriations made under the provisions of RCW 13.16.020 through 13.16.080 are to be used exclusively for the acquisition, purchase, construction or leasing of real and personal property and the employment and payment of salaries for an adequate staff of juvenile officers and necessary clerical staff and assistants and for furnishing suitable food, clothing and recreational facilities for dependent, delinquent and wayward children.

[ 1945 c 188 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 2004-3.]